Alabama, session 2026rs, SB39.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 29-2-51, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§29-2-51
(a) There is hereby created a permanent legislative
Page 1

(a) There is hereby created a permanent legislative
SB39 INTRODUCED
committee to be known as the Permanent Legislative Committee
on Reapportionment, hereinafter referred to as the
"committee."
(b)(1) Except during the quadrennium in which the
United States census is released and the Legislature is
actually involved with the reapportionment process, the
committee shall be composed of six members appointed during
the organizational session of each quadrennium to serve each
quadrennium as follows: Three members of the Senate to be
appointed by the Lieutenant Governor President Pro Tempore of
the Senate and three members of the House to be appointed by
the Speaker of the House.
(2) The committee members shall select from among its
numbers a Senator and a member of the House of Representatives
to serve as co-chairpersons for the quadrennium to preside
over meetings of the committee. Whenever the Legislature is
not in regular or special session, each member of the
committee shall be entitled to his or her usual legislative
pay, travel expenses, and per diem for each day he the member
spends in attending any such meeting or conducting business of
the committee within or without the state.
(c) In those quadrenniums in which the United States
official decennial census is released and while the
Legislature is actually involved in the reapportionment
process, the committee shall be composed of 22 members as
follows: One member of the House of Representatives from each
congressional district, four members of the House of
Representatives at-large to be appointed by the Speaker of the
Page 2

Representatives at-large to be appointed by the Speaker of the
SB39 INTRODUCED
House and one member of the Senate from each congressional
district, four members of the Senate at-large, to be appointed
by the Lieutenant Governor the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate. Upon the completion of the reapportionment process,
the committee composition shall revert to the six member
committee provided in subsection (b) hereof."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3